Hawaii statutes.
§180-5 Hearing on petition. Within
thirty days after the filing of such a petition, the department of land and
natural resources shall cause due notice to be given of a public meeting to
consider the question of the need for the creation of the district, whether
local public sentiment is in favor of its creation and the area that should be
included within its boundaries. After such meeting, if the department
determines that there is a need for the district and public sentiment favors
its creation, it shall define the boundaries for the proposed district. Should
the department deny any petition to organize a district, subsequent petitions
covering the same or substantially the same area may be filed with the
department after six months after the date of the denial of the petition. [L
1947, c 191, pt of §5; RL 1955, §28-8; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c
132, §2; am L 1967, c 145, §§1, 2; HRS §180-5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next